Hawaii statutes.
§431:4-212 Arbitrage transactions not
affected. Section 431:4-208 to section 431:4-210 shall not apply to
foreign or domestic arbitrage transactions unless made in contravention of such
rules and regulations as the commissioner may adopt in order to carry out the
purposes of section 431:4-208 to section 431:4-214. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next